Utah, session 2026, SB311.
Section 1. Section 53H-4-210 is amended to read:53H-4-210. SafeUT Crisis Line.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Commission" means the SafeUT and School Safety Commission established in this section.(b)"Huntsman Mental Health Institute" means the mental health and substance abuse treatment institute within the University of Utah Hospitals and Clinics.(2)The Huntsman Mental Health Institute shall:(a)establish the SafeUT Crisis Line to provide:(i)a means for an individual to anonymously report:(A)unsafe, violent, or criminal activities, or the threat of such activities at or near a public school;(B)incidents of bullying, cyber-bullying, harassment, or hazing; and(C)incidents of physical or sexual abuse committed by a school employee or school volunteer; and(ii)crisis intervention, including suicide prevention, to individuals experiencing emotional distress or psychiatric crisis;(b)provide the services described in Subsection (2)(a) 24 hours a day, seven days a week; (c)when necessary, or as required by law, promptly forward a report received under Subsection (2)(a) to appropriate:(i)school officials; and(ii)law enforcement officials;(d)in accordance with Subsection (2)(e), report the uses of the SafeUT Crisis Line described in Subsection (2) to the State Bureau of Investigation's systems described in Subsections 53-10-302(7) and (8);(e)coordinate with the state security chief to determine the appropriate circumstances necessitating a report described in Subsection (2)(d); and(f)subject to legislative appropriations and in consultation with the School Security Task Force described in Section 53-22-104.1, state security chief described in Section 53-22-102, and School Safety Center described in Section 53G-8-802, develop and deploy additional supports and enhancements for school safety efforts.; and(g)develop a SafeUT software application that is available in multiple languages including Spanish.(3)There is created the SafeUT and School Safety Commission composed of the following members:(a)one member who represents the Office of the Attorney General, whom the attorney general appoints;(b)one member who represents the Utah public education system, whom the State Board of Education appoints;(c)a designee of the Utah Board of Higher Education, whom the commissioner selects under direction of the board;(d)one member who represents the Department of Health and Human Services, whom the executive director of the Department of Health and Human Services appoints;(e)one member of the House of Representatives, whom the speaker of the House of Representatives appoints;(f)one member of the Senate, whom the president of the Senate appoints;(g)one member who represents the Huntsman Mental Health Institute, whom the chair of the commission appoints;(h)one member who represents law enforcement who has extensive experience in emergency response, whom the chair of the commission appoints;(i)one member who represents the Department of Health and Human Services who has experience in youth services or treatment services, whom the executive director of the Department of Health and Human Services appoints; and(j)two members of the public, whom the chair of the commission appoints.(4)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (4)(b), members of the commission shall be appointed to four-year terms.(b)The length of the terms of the members shall be staggered so that approximately half of the committee is appointed every two years.(c)When a vacancy occurs in the membership of the commission, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.(5)(a)The attorney general's designee shall serve as chair of the commission.(b)The chair shall set the agenda for commission meetings.(6)Attendance of a simple majority of the members constitutes a quorum for the transaction of official commission business.(7)Formal action by the commission requires a majority vote of a quorum.(8)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (8)(b), a member may not receive compensation, benefits, per diem, or travel expenses for the member's service.(b)Compensation and expenses of a member who is a legislator are governed by Section 36-2-2 and Legislative Joint Rules, Title 5, Legislative Compensation and Expenses.(9)The Office of the Attorney General shall provide staff support to the commission.(10)The commission shall coordinate:(a)statewide efforts related to the SafeUT Crisis Line;(b)with the State Board of Education and the board to promote awareness of the services available through the SafeUT Crisis Line; and(c)with the state security chief appointed under Section 53-22-102 to ensure appropriate reporting described in Subsections and (2)(d) and (e).(11)An A local education agency governing board shall inform students, parents, and school personnel about the SafeUT Crisis Line.(12)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (12)(b), the Huntsman Mental Health Institute may charge a fee to an institution of higher education or other entity for the use of the SafeUT Crisis Line in accordance with the method described in Subsection (12)(c).(b)The Huntsman Mental Health Institute may not charge a fee to the State Board of Education or a local education agency for the use of the SafeUT Crisis Line.(c)The commission shall establish a standard method for charging a fee described in Subsection (12)(a).

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.